SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX B 0 йĕмĕртен/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳнчен/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕртен/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳнчен/RT е
SFX B е ĕртен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳнчен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕртен/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳнчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕртен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳнчен/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 ртен/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳнчен/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕртен/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕнчен/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е инчен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕнчен/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ винчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ линчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ минчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ ринчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ синчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шинчен/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ инчен/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕнчен/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕмпе/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕрпе/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мпе/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕрпе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕрпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мпе/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕрпе/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмпе/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕрпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳпе/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕрпе/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳпе/RT е
SFX B е ĕрпе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕрпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕрпе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳпе/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 рпе/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳпе/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕрпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕпе/RT [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕпе/RT т
SFX B е ипе/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕпе/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ випе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ липе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ типе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шипе/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ипе/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕпе/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕмсĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕрсĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мсĕр/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕрсĕр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмсĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕрсĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B 0 мсĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 мĕрсĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕмсĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕмĕрсĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳсĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕрсĕр/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B е ӳсĕр/RT е
SFX B е ĕрсĕр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвӳсĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕрсĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шӳсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ вĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕрсĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ ӳсĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 рсĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йӳсĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 йĕрсĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕсĕр/RT [^еĕиӳт]
SFX B т чĕсĕр/RT т
SFX B е исĕр/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕсĕр/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ висĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ писĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шисĕр/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
SFX B ĕ исĕр/RT [^аеиуĕăӳэюя][вклмнпрсçтхчш]ĕ
SFX B 0 йĕсĕр/RT и
SFX B 0 ĕмшĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 ĕмĕршĕн/RT [^еĕиӳ]
SFX B 0 мшĕн/RT е
SFX B 0 мĕршĕн/RT е
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмшĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ĕвĕмĕршĕн/RT ӳ
SFX B ĕ вĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]вĕ
SFX B ĕ кĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]кĕ
SFX B ĕ лĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]лĕ
SFX B ĕ мĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]мĕ
SFX B ĕ нĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]нĕ
SFX B ĕ пĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]пĕ
SFX B ĕ рĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]рĕ
SFX B ĕ сĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]сĕ
SFX B ĕ çĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]çĕ
SFX B ĕ тĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]тĕ
SFX B ĕ хĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]хĕ
SFX B ĕ чĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]чĕ
SFX B ĕ шĕмшĕн/RT [аеиуĕăыӳэюя]шĕ
