SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.dic
çĕлĕк/B
çавраçил/B
çитĕнӳ/B
ăшти/B
ĕçкей/B
ĕçчен/B
ĕмĕтçĕ/B
ĕнĕм/B
ĕненӳсĕрлĕх/B
ĕревĕç/B
ĕрехмет/B
ĕшеленчĕк/FB
Авантей/B
Акмантей/B
Алшик/B
Андалуси/B
Астори/B
Ахтирек/B
Боливи/B
Вăрманкасси/B
Василий/B
Ветре/B
Гомель/B
Еçтӳк/B
Еккер/B
Емик/B
Енчĕк/B
Ехветтĕр/B
Закарпатье/B
Израиль/B
Илечер/B
Илтен/B
Илчевер/B
Ипери/B
Искер/B
Итрис/B
Кăчи/B
Кĕневер/B
Каледони/B
Кампучи/B
Катарин/B
Керӳш/B
Кубань/B
Либери/B
Мăли/B
Маççи/B
Маньчжури/B
Матви/B
Меланези/B
Мерххепе/B
Минеç/B
Миннипикке/B
Мишке/B
Муçилей/B
Натали/B
Норвеги/B
Пайкĕлти/B
Пакки/B
Пахит/B
Пикемпи/B
Пиксентей/B
Пинеркке/B
Пиньапи/B
Питтирек/B
Порфирий/B
Приуралье/B
Равиль/B
Сăвапи/B
Сĕлпикке/B
Саватни/B
Савкилтĕ/B
Саврантей/B
Сали/B
Сарански/B
Сатне/B
Сверкке/B
Сене/B
Сентимĕр/B
Серентей/B
Сертирек/B
Сийентер/B
Силкипе/B
Симен/B
Синепи/B
Ситийер/B
Смехи/B
Сӳнерпи/B
Тайвань/B
Тасмани/B
Тевлет/B
Тернополь/B
Тинĕс/B
Триодь/B
Туйнепи/B
Туркмени/B
Тюмень/B
Улентей/B
Унепи/B
Утирек/B
Ухиме/B
Франци/B
Хĕрпик/B
Халим/B
Хемит/B
Хуньтимĕр/B
Шань/B
Шемеккей/B
Шерине/B
Шехĕртин/B
Эврелĕ/B
Элккей/B
Эмиль/B
Эптĕри/B
Эрнепи/B
Этнеккей/B
Юрий/B
Яхуте/B
авиалини/B
авторизаци/B
агрономи/B
аккумуляци/B
аллитераци/B
амнисти/B
анатоми/B
антипати/B
аппликаци/B
арлаççи/B
асимметри/B
ассоциаци/B
аттесĕр/B
бактери/B
бинокль/B
бронеавтомобиль/B
вăтаçĕр/B
вĕçлев/B
вĕлтĕрен/B
вĕрентӳçĕ/B
вĕрӳç/B
вĕткеленӳ/B
вĕчĕхӳ/B
варени/B
венчет/B
вестибюль/B
виçесĕр/B
вилĕмсĕр/B
вирлĕх/B
витĕмсĕрлĕх/B
вичкĕнĕш/B
вратарь/B
вытрезвитель/B
гастроль/B
геологи/B
гидроэлектростанци/B
гляциологи/B
гуашь/B
дезинсекци/B
декольте/B
демократилĕх/B
децентрализаци/B
династи/B
диспропорци/B
дозиметри/B
духи/B
егерь/B
емпĕлчĕк/B
ерçӳ/FB
еткерçĕ/B
желе/B
замыкани/B
иçĕм/B
извещени/B
икĕпитлĕх/B
илĕртмĕш/B
илепер/B
именчĕклĕх/B
инçелĕх/B
индукци/B
инспекци/B
интерпретаци/B
инъекци/B
ирĕксĕрлӳ/B
иртекен/B
ихĕлтетӳ/B
йăлтти/B
йĕкĕлти/B
йĕкреш/B
йĕмпĕлти/B
йĕпсе/B
йĕрке/B
йĕтĕмлĕх/B
йыхравлани/B
йӳнейсĕр/B
кăкăлти/B
кĕççе/B
кĕвелĕк/B
кĕлевçĕ/B
кĕлте/B
кĕнтĕк/B
кĕпелĕх/B
кĕрĕшӳçĕ/B
кĕрептук/B
кĕркунне/B
кĕрнеклĕх/B
кĕскетӳ/B
кĕтĕ/B
кĕтӳ/B
кĕштек/B
кадриль/B
калинкке/B
кальци/B
каналйĕ/B
капăрти/B
кармунь/B
кассаци/B
квалификаци/B
кермен/B
килĕ/B
килĕшӳсĕрлĕх/B
кимĕç/B
киностуди/B
кирĕк/B
кисре/B
кишĕк/B
клеще/B
колибри/B
комбинаци/B
компарти/B
кондитерски/B
конспирации/B
контузи/B
концлагерь/B
коррози/B
крематори/B
кронциркуль/B
кулинари/B
курите/B
кушиле/B
кӳлешӳ/B
кӳпчем/B
лăкăшти/B
лĕнкĕрчĕк/B
лакăрти/B
латифунди/B
лекке/B
ленкке/B
лифчик/B
лояльность/B
мăнами/B
мĕлкев/B
мĕшĕлти/B
малярий/B
матери/B
медкомисси/B
меллĕх/B
мере/B
металлографи/B
мехел/B
микротĕнче/B
миме/B
мисси/B
модернизаци/B
монополизаци/B
мультипликаци/B
мэри/B
навигаци/B
наступлени/B
нейтрализаци/B
нефтехими/B
ниш/B
нӳрлĕх/B
общежити/B
олигархи/B
орги/B
отоларингологи/B
пĕçеркке/B
пĕкĕрĕлчĕк/B
пĕлменлĕх/B
пĕрĕнчĕк/B
пĕркеленчĕк/B
пĕрмек/B
пĕрчĕ/B
пĕтĕмлĕх/B
пĕтнĕк/B
пакăлти/B
париш/B
паспортизаци/B
пекĕ/B
пепке/B
перхелей/B
пешне/B
пик/AB
пилĕккĕтеслĕх/B
пир/B
питĕлĕх/B
пиччĕн/B
подразделени/B
политуправлени/B
порнографи/B
поэтизаци/B
преми/B
провинци/B
промкоопераци/B
психастени/B
пуласси/B
пумаçи/B
пус/HB
пуштĕр/B
пӳлĕхçĕ/B
пӳрне/B
пӳске/B
радиоизлучени/B
разнорабочи/B
рационалиэаци/B
регали/B
резерваци/B
реле/B
репатриаци/B
рехет/B
ротаци/B
сĕлеке/B
сĕнтĕрвăрри/B
сĕт/B
савит/B
самоуправлени/B
сведени/B
селенологи/B
сепараци/B
сертелĕх/B
сигарет/B
сикĕлчĕк/B
сикчев/B
симметрилĕх/B
синонимилĕх/B
сисĕм/B
скумбри/B
содержани/B
сочинени/B
стадилĕх/B
стратеги/B
сурхури/B
сӳпĕлти/B
тăрăлти/B
тĕкĕрçĕ/B
тĕлĕнчĕк/B
тĕнккев/B
тĕрĕçĕ/B
тĕркĕ/B
тĕтĕрхĕç/B
театрализаци/B
темтепĕр/B
терци/B
тикĕт/B
типографи/B
тиркевсĕрлĕх/B
традици/B
туртмалли/B
тӳпе/B
тӳсĕмсĕр/B
уни/B
ухлĕм/B
физиологи/B
фортификаци/B
хăшкăлти/B
хĕр/B
хĕрхи/B
хатĕр/FB
хирĕлчĕк/B
хулпуççи/B
хӳтлĕх/B
чĕвĕлтетӳ/B
чĕлтĕрти/B
чĕрçитти/B
чĕрнеккей/B
чемчеке/B
чечекçĕ/B
чилек/B
чӳхенчĕк/B
шĕпшĕл/B
шелсĕр/B
шиклĕх/B
шыври/B
экранизаци/B
электроĕçлев/B
эмел/B
эпилепси/B
эрудици/B
юпленчĕк/B
ӳкем/B
ӳрече/B
ӳхĕ/B
